Massachusetts, session 194th, S1414.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 10H of Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraphs:-  
“The division shall establish a rate for applied behavior analysis services for all providers 
who are licensed to provide said services by the Board of Registration of Allied Mental Health 
and Human Services Professions of the Department of Public Health.   
The division shall adopt reimbursement codes and modifiers as necessary so that all 
licensed providers of applied behavioral analysis, as established by the Board of Registration of 
Allied Mental Health and Human Services Professions of the Department of Public Health, may 
be eligible to submit for reimbursement from the division, its contracted health insurers, health 
plans, health maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third party 
administrator.”